Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201160-4,145
Application; operation in interstate
or foreign commerce; certification required.

This section applies up to and including December 31, 2011. Upon
making any application pursuant to section 60-4,144, any applicant who operates
or expects to operate a commercial motor vehicle in interstate or foreign
commerce and who is subject to 49 C.F.R. part 391 adopted pursuant to section
75-363 shall certify that the applicant meets the qualification requirements
of 49 C.F.R. part 391. A commercial driver's license examiner may require
any applicant making certification pursuant to this section to demonstrate
with or without the aid of corrective devices sufficient powers of eyesight
to enable him or her to operate a commercial motor vehicle in conformance
with the minimum vision requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 391 adopted pursuant
to section 75-363. If from the examination given it appears that any applicant's
powers of eyesight are such that he or she cannot meet the minimum vision
requirements, the examiner shall allow the applicant to present an ophthalmologist's
or optometrist's certificate to the effect that the applicant has sufficient
powers of eyesight for such purpose before issuing a commercial driver's license
to the applicant. If the examination given by the commercial driver's license
examiner or the ophthalmologist's or optometrist's certificate indicates that
the applicant must wear a corrective device to meet the minimum vision requirements
established by this section, the applicant shall have the use of the commercial
driver's license issued to him or her restricted to wearing a corrective device
while operating a motor vehicle. An applicant who has been issued a waiver
or exemption by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration from the vision
requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. 391.41(b)(10) may be issued an interstate
commercial driver's license without meeting the vision requirements set forth
in 49 C.F.R. 391.41(b)(10).

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 95;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 30;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 15.